Washington statutes.
RCW 42.52.450

Complaint against legislator or statewide elected official.

(1) If a complaint alleges a violation of RCW 42.52.180 by a legislator or statewide elected official other than the attorney general, the attorney general shall, if requested by the appropriate ethics board, conduct the investigation under RCW 42.52.420 and recommend action.

(2) If a complaint alleges a violation of RCW 42.52.180 by the attorney general, the state auditor shall conduct the investigation under RCW 42.52.420 and recommend action to the appropriate ethics board.

[ 2005 c 116 s 2; 1994 c 154 s 215.]